Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-491
Hunting permit; habitat stamp; required; nonresidents, requirements.

Every individual hunting game birds upon a licensed game breeding and controlled shooting area shall secure a hunting permit and a habitat stamp in accordance with the laws of the State of Nebraska, except that nonresidents of the State of Nebraska are not required to secure a hunting permit but are required to secure a habitat stamp and pay a license fee, not less than the cost of a resident hunting permit, as established by the commission pursuant to section 37-327.

Laws 1957, c. 152, § 8, p. 494;

Laws 1976, LB 861, § 19;

Laws 1993, LB 235, § 31;

R.S.1943, (1993), § 37-908;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 201;

Laws 2002, LB 1003, § 24.